test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/V-II-mihkwaw_gt-norm.yaml
Condfig:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - mihkwâw - help : # Wolvengrey VIIv:


     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Sg:  mihkwâw
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Pl:  mihkwâwa
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prs+4Sg:  mihkwâyiw
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prs+4Pl:  mihkwâyiwa
     
     PV/e+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-mihkwâk, êmihkwâk]
     PV/e+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-mihkwâki, êmihkwâki]
     PV/e+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prs+4Sg: [ê-mihkwâyik, êmihkwâyik]
     PV/e+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prs+4Pl: [ê-mihkwâyiki, êmihkwâyiki]
     
     mihkwâw+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Sg:  mihkwâki
     mihkwâw+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Pl:  mihkwâkwâwi
     mihkwâw+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Sg:  mihkwâyiki
     mihkwâw+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Pl:  mihkwâyikwâwi
